Washington statutes.
RCW 11.11.070

Ownership rights as between individuals preserved—Testamentary beneficiary may recover nonprobate asset from beneficiary—Limitation on action to recover.

(1) The protection accorded to financial institutions and other third parties under RCW 11.11.040 has no bearing on the actual rights of ownership to nonprobate assets as between beneficiaries and testamentary beneficiaries, and their heirs, successors, personal representatives, and assigns.

(2) A testamentary beneficiary entitled to a nonprobate asset otherwise transferred to a beneficiary not so entitled, and a personal representative of the owner's estate on behalf of the testamentary beneficiary, may petition the superior court having jurisdiction over the owner's estate for an order declaring that the testamentary beneficiary is so entitled, the hearing of the petition to be held in accordance with *chapter 11.96 RCW.

(3) A testamentary beneficiary claiming a nonprobate asset who has not filed such a petition within the earlier of: (a) Six months from the date of admission of the will to probate; and (b) one year from the date of the owner's death, shall be forever barred from making such a claim or commencing such an action.

[ 1998 c 292 s 111.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 11.96 RCW was repealed by 1999 c 42 s 637, effective January 1, 2000.